apertium-tat.err.twol
Alphabet

 А Ә Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж Җ З И Й К Л М Н Ң О Ө П Р С Т У Ү Ф Х Һ Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я  
 а ә б в г д е ё ж җ з и й к л м н ң о ө п р с т у ү ф х һ ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я 
 %0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9
 %{A%}:а %{I%}:ы %{E%}:а %{U%}:у

 %{L%}:л %{G%}:г %{D%}:д %{K%}:к

 %{s%}:с %{j%}:0 %{w%}:0 %{n%}:0 %{l%}:л %{ъ%}:0 %{т%}:0 %{д%}:0 %{е%}:ы %{ь%}:0

! For proper nouns, e.g. татарстан instead of Tatarstan
А:а Ә:ә Б:б В:в Г:г Д:д Е:е Ё:ё Ж:ж Җ:җ З:з И:и Й:й К:к Л:л М:м Н:н Ң:ң О:о Ө:ө 
П:п Р:р С:с Т:т У:у Ү:ү Ф:ф Х:х Һ:һ Ц:ц Ч:ч Ш:ш Щ:щ Ъ:ъ Ы:ы Ь:ь Э:э Ю:ю Я:я 


 %>:0 % 

 !!! These are needed for the phonology of numbers, alphabetisms, and acronyms
 !!! They trigger relevant phonology and disappear
 %{а%}:0 %{э%}:0
 %{й%}:0 %{л%}:0 %{н%}:0 %{з%}:0 %{с%}:0 
 !!! And this is for Russian nouns
 %{☭%}:0 ;


Sets

BackVow    =  А О Ы У
              а о ы у ;


FrontVow   =  Ә Е Э И Ө Ү
              ә е э и ө ү; 

UnambigFrontVow =  Ә Э Ө Ү
                   ә э ө ү; 

AmbigVow  = Я Е Ю
            я е ю ;

Vow       = А О Ы У Я Ю Ә Е Э И Ө Ү
            а о ы у я ю ә е э и ө ү;

BeginVow  = А О Ы У Ә Э И Ө Ү
            а о ы у ә э и ө ү ;

Cns       =  Б В Г Д Ж Җ З Й К Л М Н Ң П Р С Т Ф Х Һ Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ь
             б в г д ж җ з й к л м н ң п р с т ф х һ ц ч ш щ ъ ь % 
				 ү Ү у У ю Ю ;

NasalCns  =  М Н Ң
             м н ң ; 

VoicedCns =  Б Д Г В З Ж 
             б д г в з ж ;

CnsVoiceless = К П Т Ф Х Һ Ц Ч С Ш Щ
               к п т ф х һ ц ч с ш щ ;

Rules 

"A Vowel Harmony"
%{A%}:ә <=>         [ :FrontVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | [ :0 - [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] ] ] _ ;
                                                               [ ь: :Cns* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
      [ [ :и | :UnambigFrontVow | :ь ] :я :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | [ :0 - %{ъ%}:0 ] ] _ ;
    [ :FrontVow [ :Cns | :AmbigVow ]* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | [ :0 - [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] ] ] _ ;
           except
                 [ :BackVow й:0 :AmbigVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                             [ :у :е :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ; !# уен, муен, куен

!                                    [ %{ъ%}: ]/[ %>: ] _ ;
!                 :FrontVow :л %>: :л _ р ;   ! WTF is this for?
                                      _ (%>:) %{E%}:и ;
!                                      _ %>: %{E%}:й ;
                                                                    _ %>: %{E%}: ;
                                       [ [ :Vow %{j%}: ] | й: ]/%>: _ ;
            :Vow/:0 _ %{E%}:/:0 ;
 [ :BackVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ (%>:) %{E%}: ;
     .#. [ [ :я | :ю ] :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ (%>:) %{E%}: ;


"I Vowel Harmony"
%{I%}:е <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | [ :0 - [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] ] ] _ ;
!                                 [ :BackVow :Cns* й: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                                                             [ й: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                                                  [ :Cns ь: :Cns* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
[ [ :и | :UnambigFrontVow | :ь ] :я :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | [ :0 - %{ъ%}:0 ] ] _ ;
                                          [ %{ь%}:0 :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - %{ь%}:0 ] ] _ ;
                              [ [ :Vow %{j%}: ] | й: ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - %{j%}: ] ] _ ; ! ай>{s}{I}:ае
                                                                   ! ди{j}>{I}п:дип
                                                                   ! ди{j}>{I}{l}>{G}{A}н:диелгән
                                                                   ! ди{j}>{E}:ди
                                                                   .#. :д :и %>: _ ;
            except
                 [ :BackVow (й:0) :AmbigVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                                                     %{n%}: %>: н:0 _ .#. ;
!                             [ :у :е :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | :0 ] _ ; !# уен, муен, куен  ! this is taken care of above by :BackVow (й:0) :AmbigVow
                             [? - :д ] [ :Vow - [ :Cns | :и ] ]/[ [ :0 - й: ] | %>: ] _ ; ! avoid conflict with {I} deletion
                                          .#. :д :и %>: _ [ :п | :ң ];
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!                                          
                               %{n%}:/:0 _ ;
!      [ :BackVow :Cns* й: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                     [ й: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
            .#. :д :и %>: _ [ ? - [ :п | :ң ] ];
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


!"I vowel Harmony for ди"
!%{I%}:е <=> .#. :д :и %>: _ ;
!        except
!            .#. :д :и %>: _ [ ? - [ :п | :ң ] ];


"Epenthetic {e} Vowel Harmony"
%{е%}:е <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | [ :0 - [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] ] ] _ ;
            _ %>: %{s%}: ;
            except
                              _ :Cns %>: :0* :Vow ;
                              _ :Cns %>: %{s%}: ;
                              _ :Cns %{е%}: %>: %{s%}: ;
                              _ :Cns %{е%}: %>: %{I%}: ;
                              _ .#. ;
                              _ %>: [ ? - %{s%}: ] ;


"Epenthetic {е} Deletion"
%{е%}:0 <=> _ :Cns %>: :0* :Vow ;         ! ур{e}н>{s}{I}{n}:урны
            _ :Cns %>: %{s%}: ;           ! ур{e}н>{s}{I}{n}>{D}{A}н:урнынан
!            _ :Cns %{е%}: %>: %{s%}: ;    ! сең{е}л{е}>{s}{I}{n}:сеңлесе
!            _ :Cns %{е%}: %>: %{I%}: ;    ! сең{е}л{е}>{I}м:сеңлем
            _ :Cns %{е%}: %>: (%{s%}:) %{I%}: ;    ! сең{е}л{е}>{I}м:сеңлем
            _ .#. ;                       ! сең{е}л{е}:сеңел
            _ %>: [ ? - %{s%}:] ;         ! сең{е}л{е}>{G}{A}:сеңелгә
        except
            _ %>: %{s%}: ;

"Plural alternation after nasal"
%{L%}:н <=> :NasalCns/[ %>: | :0 ] _ %{A%}: р ; 

"Deletion of {s} after a consonant"
%{s%}:0 <=> [ :Cns | %{j%}:0 | %{w%}:0 ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                                           й:0 %>:/:0 _ ;
!               [ ю: | у: | ү: | %{U%}: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
            except
                .#. а: б: ы: й: %>: _ ; ! абыйсы
                         %{е%}: %>: _ ;


"Voicing of к/п"
! intervocalic:          ! before -рак/-рәк
!! китап>{c}{I}          !! кызык>рак !! кысып>рак
!! китабы                !! кызыграк  !! кысыбрак

Cx:Cy <=> :Vow (:0) _ %>: (:0) :Vow ;
          _ %>: :р ;
          where Cx in ( п к )
                Cy in ( б г )
                matched;

!!!! possessive+case phonology !!!!

"extra n appears before locative, dative, ablative, accusative"
%{n%}:н <=> _ [ [ %{D%}: | %{G%}: ] %{A%}: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
            _ %>: н: %{I%}: .#. ;
!елында, елына, елыннан, елын

"ablative D to н between nasal codas"
%{D%}:н <=> :NasalCns %>:0 _ %{A%}: :н ;
!елыннан, елымнан, елыңнан

!"dative G deletes after nasal-final possessive morphemes"
!%{G%}:0 <=> [ %{I%}: :NasalCns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;

"delete accusative н after px3"
н:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: .#. ;

"delete accusative {I} after px3"
%{I%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: н:0 _ .#. ;


"E Vowel Harmony"
%{E%}:ә <=> [ :FrontVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - %{A%}: ] ] _ ;
            except
                       [ :Vow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
!                                      ә: %>: _ ;
!                               :FrontVow %>: _ ;
                         %{A%}:/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
               [ е: | ә: ] [ %>: | %{A%}: ]* _ ;
                [ [ :Vow %{j%}: ] | й: ]/%>: _ ;

"Turn {E} into й after a vowel"
%{E%}:й <=> [ :Vow - :FrontVow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
            except
!                           ә: %>: _ ;
!             %{A%}:ә/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
!             %{A%}:0/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
     [ :FrontVow :Cns* :Cns %{A%}: ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ %{A%}: | FrontVow: ] ] ] _ ;  
     [ е: | ә: ] [ %>: | %{A%}: ]* _ ;
                    FrontVow:0 %>: _ ;
      [ [ :Vow %{j%}: ] | й: ]/%>: _ ;
                            :у %>: _ ;
                 [ :и %{A%}: ]/%>: _ ;

"Deletion of {E} in ди"
%{E%}:0 <=> .#. :д :и %>: _ ;

"Turn {E} into и to combine with ә and е"  ! сөйлә>{E}:сөйли
                                           ! төзе>{E}:төзи
!%{E%}:и <=> ә: %>: _ ;
!            е: %>: _ ;
!        %{A%}: %>: _ ;
%{E%}:и <=> [ е: | ә: ] [ %>: | %{A%}: ]* _ ;
!            :FrontVow [ %>: | %{A%}: ]* _ ;
!               %{A%}: %>: _ ;
            [ :FrontVow :Cns* :Cns %{A%}: ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ %{A%}: | FrontVow: ] ] ] _ ;  
!            :FrontVow %>: _ ;
            [ :и %{A%}: ]/%>: _ ;
        except
            [ [ :Vow %{j%}: ] | й: ]/%>: _ ;
            .#. :д :и %>: _ ;
            [ :FrontVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ %{A%}: | FrontVow: ] ] ] _ ;

"Delete ә before E:и"
ә:0 <=> _ [ %>: | %{A%}:0 ]* %{E%}:и ;

"Delete е before E:и"
е:0 <=> _ [ %>: | %{A%}:0 ]* %{E%}:и ;

"я to й before %{A%}"
я:й <=> _ ( %>: ) %{A%}: ;

"Delete {A} before E:и"
%{A%}:0 <=> _ (%>:) %{E%}:и ;
            :Vow/:0 _ %{E%}:/:0 ;
        except
            [ :BackVow :Cns* [ :Cns - й: ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ( %>: ) %{E%}: ;
     .#. [ [ :я | :ю ] :Cns* [ :Cns - й: ] ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ( %>: ) %{E%}: ;
            [ [ :Vow %{j%}: ] | й:]/%>: _ [ ? - %{E%}: ]/:0 ;
            .#. :д :и %>: _ ;

"Turn а to ы before E:й"
а:ы <=> _ [ %>: | %{A%}:0 ]* %{E%}:й ;

"Turn A to ы before E:й"
%{A%}:ы <=> [ :BackVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ (%>:) [ %{E%}: - :и ] ;
     .#. [ [ :я | :ю ] :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ (%>:) [ %{E%}: - :и ] ;
        except
!            [ [ :Vow %{j%}: ] | й:]/%>: _ [ ? - %{E%}: ]/:0 ;
                     [ [ :Vow %{j%}: ] | й:]/%>: _ ;

!"Get rid of {j} after a consonant"
!%{j%}:0 <=> :Cns/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;

"Deletion of {I} after vowels"
%{I%}:0 <=> [ :Vow - :Cns ]/[ [ :0 - й: ] | %>: ] _ ;
            .#. :д :и %>: _ [ :п | :ң ];
            except
                               %{n%}:/:0 _ ;
!      [ :BackVow :Cns* й: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                     [ й: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
            .#. :д :и %>: _ [ ? - [ :п | :ң ] ];
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!                                          
[ :FrontVow :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | [ :0 - [ %{ъ%}: | %{☭%}: ] ] ] _ ;
!                                 [ :BackVow :Cns* й: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                                                             [ й: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
                                                  [ :Cns ь: :Cns* ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
[ [ :и | :UnambigFrontVow | :ь ] :я :Cns* :Cns ]/[ %>: | %  | [ :0 - %{ъ%}:0 ] ] _ ;
                                          [ %{ь%}:0 :Cns* ]/[ [ :0 - %{ь%}:0 ] ] _ ;
                              [ [ :Vow %{j%}: ] | й: ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - %{j%}: ] ] _ ; ! ай>{s}{I}:ае
                                                                   ! ди{j}>{I}п:дип
                                                                   ! ди{j}>{I}{l}>{G}{A}н:диелгән
                                                                   ! ди{j}>{E}:ди
                                                                   .#. :д :и %>: _ ;
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
            
            
            
            
            

!"Back assimilation of G"
!%{G%}:ғ <=> [ :BackVow :Cns* ]/[ %>: | :0 | :и | :у ] _ ;
!            except
!    :CnsVoiceless/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
!!        :FrontCns/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
!                   :NasalCns %>: _ %{A%}: .#. ;

! I don't think this happens after /r/?  -JNW
"Passive {l} becomes n after verb stem ending in /l/ or /r/"
%{l%}:н <=> [ л :Vow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
!            [ р :Vow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ; ! бирелгән, каралган - I don't think that
                                         ! the last line is needed /IS/

"Forward voicing assimilation"
Cx:Cy <=> :CnsVoiceless/[ %>: | %  | :0 | :ь | :ъ ] _ ;
          where Cx in ( %{G%} %{D%} )
                Cy in (   к     т   )
                matched;

!!!! {U} stuff !!!!
